District of Columbia statutes.
44-1051.18

Sanctions.

Civil fines, penalties, and related costs may be imposed against a nurse staffing agency for the violation of any provision of this chapter, of any regulation promulgated pursuant to this chapter, or of any other applicable District of Columbia or federal law. Procedures for adjudication and enforcement, and applicable fines, penalties, and costs, shall be those established by or pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

History

March 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-74, § 18, 50 DCR 10914